California statutes. Education Code
Article V. Interstate Cooperation
The party states agree that:

1. They will, so far as practicable, prefer the making of multilateral contracts pursuant to Article III of this agreement.

2. They will facilitate and strengthen cooperation in interstate certification and other elements of educational personnel qualification and for this purpose shall cooperate with agencies, organizations, and associations interested in certification and other elements of educational personnel qualification.
 
Article VI. Agreement Evaluation
The designated state officials of any party state may meet from time to time as a group to evaluate progress under the agreement, and to formulate recommendations for changes.
 
Article VII. Other Arrangements
Nothing in this agreement shall be construed to prevent or inhibit other arrangements or practices of any party state or states to facilitate the interchange of educational personnel.
 
Article VIII. Effect and Withdrawal
1. This agreement shall become effective when enacted into law by two states. Thereafter it shall become effective as to any state upon its enactment of this agreement.

2. Any party state may withdraw from this agreement by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until one year after the governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of the withdrawal to the governors of all other party states.

3. No withdrawal shall relieve the withdrawing state of any obligation imposed upon it by a contract to which it is a party. The duration of contracts and the methods and conditions of withdrawal therefrom shall be those specified in their terms.
 
Article IX. Construction and Severability
This agreement shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this agreement shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this agreement is declared to be contrary to the Constitution of any state or of the United States, or the application thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this agreement and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this agreement shall be held contrary to the Constitution of any state participating therein, the agreement shall remain in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 18, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12501.

The “designated state official” for this state shall be the Superintendent. The Superintendent shall enter into contracts pursuant to Article III of the agreement only with the approval of the specific text of the contract by the state board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 3.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Compact for Education [12510. - 12515.5.]

12510.

The Compact for Education is hereby entered into with all jurisdictions joining therein, in the form as follows:
Article I. Purpose and Policy

(a) It is the purpose of this compact to:

1. Establish and maintain close cooperation and understanding among executive, legislative, professional educational and lay leadership on a nationwide basis at the state and local levels.

2. Provide a forum for the discussion, development, crystallization and recommendation of public policy alternatives in the field of education.

3. Provide a clearinghouse of information on matters relating to educational problems and how they are being met in different places throughout the nation, so that the executive and legislative branches of state government and of local communities may have ready access to the experience and record of the entire country, and so that both lay and professional groups in the field of education may have additional avenues for the sharing of experience and the interchange of ideas in the formation of public policy in education.

4. Facilitate the improvement of state and local educational systems so that all of them will be able to meet adequate and desirable goals in a society which requires continuous qualitative and quantitative advance in educational opportunities, methods and facilities.

(b) It is the policy of this compact to encourage and promote local and state initiative in the development, maintenance, improvement and administration of educational systems and institutions in a manner which will accord with the needs and advantages of diversity among localities and states.

(c) The party states recognize that each of them has an interest in the quality and quantity of education furnished in each of the other states, as well as in the excellence of its own educational systems and institutions, because of the highly mobile character of individuals within the nation, and because the products and services contributing to the health, welfare and economic advancement of each state are supplied in significant part by persons educated in other states. 
 
Article II. State Defined
As used in this compact, “state” means a state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico. 
 
Article III. The Commission
(a) The Educational Commission of the States, hereinafter called “the commission,” is hereby established. The commission shall consist of seven members representing each party state. One of such members shall be the governor, two shall be members of the state legislature selected by its respective houses and serving in such manner as the legislature may determine; and four shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor, unless the laws of the state otherwise provide. If the laws of a state prevent legislators from serving on the commission, six members shall be appointed and serve at the pleasure of the governor, unless the laws of the state otherwise provide. In addition to any other principles or requirements which a state may establish for the appointment and service of its members of the commission, the guiding principle for the composition of the membership on the commission from each party state shall be that the members representing such state shall, by virtue of their training, experience, knowledge or affiliations be in a position collectively to reflect broadly the interests of the state government, higher education, the state education system, local education, lay and professional, public and nonpublic educational leadership. Of those appointees, one shall be the head of a state agency or institution, designated by the governor, having responsibility for one or more programs of public education. In addition to the members of the commission representing the party states, there may be not to exceed 10 nonvoting commissioners selected by the steering committee for terms of one year. Such commissioners shall represent leading national organizations of professional educators or persons concerned with educational administration.

(b) The members of the commission shall be entitled to one vote each on the commission. No action of the commission shall be binding unless taken at a meeting at which a majority of the total number of votes on the commission are cast in favor thereof. Action of the commission shall be only at a meeting at which a majority of the commissioners are present. The commission shall meet at least once a year. In its bylaws, and subject to such directions and limitations as may be contained therein, the commission may delegate the exercise of any of its powers to the steering committee or the executive director, except for the power to approve budgets or requests for appropriations, the power to make policy recommendations pursuant to Article IV and adoption of the annual report pursuant to Article III(j).

(c) The commission shall have a seal.

(d) The commission shall elect annually, from among its members, a chairman, who shall be a governor, a vice chairman and a treasurer. The commission shall provide for the appointment of an executive director. Such executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the commission, and together with the treasurer and such other personnel as the commission may deem appropriate shall be bonded in such amount as the commission shall determine. The executive director shall be secretary.

(e) Irrespective of the civil service, personnel or other merit system laws of any of the party states, the executive director subject to the approval of the steering committee shall appoint, remove or discharge such personnel as may be necessary for the performance of the functions of the commission, and shall fix the duties and compensation of such personnel. The commission in its bylaws shall provide for the personnel policies and programs of the commission.

(f) The commission may borrow, accept or contract for the services of personnel from any party jurisdiction, the United States, or any subdivision or agency of the aforementioned governments, or from any agency of two or more of the party jurisdictions or their subdivisions.

(g) The commission may accept for any of its purposes and functions under this compact any and all donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, conditional or otherwise, from any state, the United States, or any other governmental agency, or from any person, firm, association, foundation, or corporation, and may receive, utilize and dispose of the same. Any donation or grant accepted by the commission pursuant to this paragraph or services borrowed pursuant to paragraph (f) of this article shall be reported in the annual report of the commission. Such report shall include the nature, amount and conditions, if any, of the donation, grant, or services borrowed, and the identity of the donor or lender.

(h) The commission may establish and maintain such facilities as may be necessary for the transacting of its business. The commission may acquire, hold, and convey real and personal property and any interest therein.

(i) The commission shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of its business and shall have the power to amend and rescind these bylaws. The commission shall publish its bylaws in convenient form and shall file a copy thereof and a copy of any amendments thereto, with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the party states.

(j) The commission annually shall make to the governor and legislature of each party state a report covering the activities of the commission for the preceding year. The commission may make such additional reports as it may deem desirable.
 
Article IV. Powers
In addition to authority conferred on the commission by other provisions of the compact, the commission shall have authority to:

1. Collect, correlate, analyze and interpret information and data concerning educational needs and resources.

2. Encourage and foster research in all aspects of education, but with special reference to the desirable scope of instruction, organization, administration, and instructional methods and standards employed or suitable for employment in public educational systems.

3. Develop proposals for adequate financing of education as a whole and at each of its many levels.

4. Conduct or participate in research of the types referred to in this article in any instance where the commission finds that such research is necessary for the advancement of the purposes and policies of this compact, utilizing fully the resources of national associations, regional compact organizations for higher education, and other agencies and institutions, both public and private.

5. Formulate suggested policies and plans for the improvement of public education as a whole, or for any segment thereof, and make recommendations with respect thereto available to the appropriate governmental units, agencies and public officials.

6. Do such other things as may be necessary or incidental to the administration of any of its authority or functions pursuant to this compact.
 
Article V. Cooperation with Federal Government
(a) If the laws of the United States specifically so provide, or if administrative provision is made therefor within the federal government, the United States may be represented on the commission by not to exceed 10 representatives. Any such representative or representatives of the United States shall be appointed and serve in such manner as may be provided by or pursuant to federal law, and may be drawn from any one or more branches of the federal government, but no such representative shall have a vote on the commission.

(b) The commission may provide information and make recommendations to any executive or legislative agency or officer of the federal government concerning the common educational policies of the states, and may advise with any such agencies or officers concerning any matter of mutual interest.
 
Article VI. Committees
(a) To assist in the expeditious conduct of its business when the full commission is not meeting, the commission shall elect a steering committee of 32 members which, subject to the provisions of this compact and consistent with the policies of the commission, shall be constituted and function as provided in the bylaws of the commission. One-fourth of the voting membership of the steering committee shall consist of governors, one-fourth shall consist of legislators, and the remainder shall consist of other members of the commission. A federal representative on the commission may serve with the steering committee, but without vote. The voting members of the steering committee shall serve for terms of two years, except that members elected to the first steering committee of the commission shall be elected as follows: 16 for 1 year and 16 for 2 years. The chairman, vice chairman, and treasurer of the commission shall be members of the steering committee and, anything in this paragraph to the contrary notwithstanding, shall serve during their continuance in these offices. Vacancies in the steering committee shall not affect its authority to act, but the commission at its next regularly ensuing meeting following the occurrence of any vacancy shall fill it for the unexpired term. No person shall serve more than two terms as a member of the steering committee; provided that service for a partial term of one year or less shall not be counted toward the two-term limitation.

(b) The commission may establish advisory and technical committees composed of state, local, and federal officials, and private persons to advise it with respect to any one or more of its functions. Any advisory or technical committee may, on request of the states concerned, be established to consider any matter of special concern to two or more of the party states.

(c) The commission may establish such additional committees as its bylaws may provide.
 
Article VII. Finance
(a) The commission shall advise the governor or designated officer or officers of each party state of its budget and estimated expenditures for such period as may be required by the laws of that party state. Each of the commission’s budgets of estimated expenditures shall contain specific recommendations of the amount or amounts to be appropriated by each of the party states.

(b) The total amount of appropriation requests under any budget shall be apportioned among the party states. In making such apportionment, the commission shall devise and employ a formula that takes equitable account of the populations and per capita income levels of the party states.

(c) The commission shall not pledge the credit of any party states. The commission may meet any of its obligations in whole or in part with funds available to it pursuant to Article III(g) of this compact, provided that the commission takes specific action setting aside such funds prior to incurring an obligation to be met in whole or in part in such manner. Except where the commission makes use of funds available to it pursuant to Article III(g) thereof, the commission shall not incur any obligation prior to the allotment of funds by the party states adequate to meet the same.

(d) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established by its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by a qualified public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual reports of the commission.

(e) The accounts of the commission shall be open at any reasonable time for inspection by duly constituted officers of the party states and by any persons authorized by the commission.

(f) Nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent commission compliance with laws relating to audit or inspection of accounts by or on behalf of any government contributing to the support of the commission.
 
Article VIII. Eligible Parties; Entry Into and Withdrawal
(a) This compact shall have as eligible parties all states, territories, and possessions of the United States, the District of Columbia, and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico. In respect of any such jurisdiction not having a governor, the term “governor,” as used in this compact, shall mean the closest equivalent official of such jurisdiction.

(b) Any state or other eligible jurisdiction may enter into this compact and it shall become binding thereon when it has adopted the same; provided that in order to enter into initial effect, adoption by at least 10 eligible party jurisdictions shall be required.

(c) Adoption of the compact may be either by enactment thereof or by adherence thereto by the governor; provided that in the absence of enactment, adherence by the governor shall be sufficient to make his state a party only until December 31, 1967. During any period when a state is participating in this compact through gubernatorial action, the governor shall appoint those persons who, in addition to himself, shall serve as the members of the commission from his state, and shall provide to the commission an equitable share of the financial support of the commission from any source available to him.

(d) Except for a withdrawal effective on December 31, 1967, in accordance with paragraph (c) of this article, any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until one year after the governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of the withdrawal to the governors of all other party states. No withdrawal shall affect any liability already incurred by or chargeable to a party state prior to the time of such withdrawal.
 
Article IX. Construction and Severability
This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any state or of the United States, or the application thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating therein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 18, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12511.

Pursuant to subdivision (i) of Article III of the compact, the commission shall file a copy of its bylaws and any amendment thereto with the Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12512.

The Member of the Assembly who shall serve upon the Educational Commission of the States representing the State of California shall be selected by the Speaker of the Assembly, and the Member of the Senate who shall serve thereon shall be selected by the Senate Committee on Rules. Each legislative member shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing power. For the purposes of this chapter, such Members of the Legislature shall constitute a joint interim legislative committee on the subject of this chapter and shall have the powers and duties imposed upon such committees by the Joint Rules of the Senate and Assembly.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 18, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12513.

At the same time as the report rendered to the governors and legislatures of the states is made available in California pursuant to subdivision (j) of Article III of the compact, the California delegation to the Educational Commission of the States shall submit to the Governor and to the Legislature of this state a summary of its views that differ from the recommendations submitted by the Educational Commission of the States.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 18, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12514.

The members of the California delegation to the Educational Commission of the States shall receive no salary, but shall receive actual and necessary expenses incurred in fulfilling their duties.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 18, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12515.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the Compact for Education set out in Section 12510 to the contrary, the four persons to be appointed by the Governor of California to serve as members of the Educational Commission of the States, shall be the following:

(a) Either a member of the State Board of Education, or a member of a local school district governing board.

(b) Either the Superintendent of Public Instruction, or another individual representing the public school system of this state or private elementary and secondary schools of this state.

(c) An individual representing the public institutions of higher education in this state.

(d) An individual representing the private institutions of higher education in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 18, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12515.5.

For the 1981–82 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, funding for the purpose of payment of annual dues for the support of the Educational Commission of the States shall be provided within the annual Budget Act appropriation to the State Department of Education.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 18, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 8.5. THE CALIFORNIA CIVIL LIBERTIES PUBLIC EDUCATION ACT [13000. - 13030.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [13000. - 13000.]

13000.

(a) This part shall be known and may be cited as the California Civil Liberties Public Education Act. The purpose of the California Civil Liberties Public Education Act is to sponsor public educational activities and the development of educational materials to ensure that the events surrounding the exclusion, forced removal, and internment of citizens and permanent residents of Japanese ancestry will be remembered, and so that the causes and circumstances of this and similar events may be illuminated and understood.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the federal Commission on Wartime Relocation and Internment of Civilians (CWRIC) was established by Congress in 1980 to
 “review the facts and circumstances surrounding Executive Order 9066, issued in February 19, 1942, and the impact of such Executive Order on American citizens and permanent residents... and to recommend appropriate remedies.” The CWRIC issued a report of its findings in 1983 with the reports “Personal Justice Denied” and “Personal Justice Denied-Part II, Recommendations.” The reports were based on information gathered “through 20 days of hearings in cities across the country, particularly the West Coast, hearing testimony from more than 750 witnesses: evacuees, former government officials, public figures, interested citizens, and historians and other professionals who have studied the subjects of Commission inquiry.”

(c) The lessons to be learned from the internment of Japanese Americans during World War II are embodied in “Personal
 Justice Denied-Part II, Recommendations.” The CWRIC concluded as follows: “In sum, Executive Order 9066 was not justified by military necessity, and the decisions that followed from it-exclusion, detention, the ending of detention and the ending of exclusion-were not founded upon military considerations. The broad historical causes that shaped these decisions were race prejudice, war hysteria, and a failure of political leadership. Widespread ignorance about Americans of Japanese descent contributed to a policy conceived in haste and executed in an atmosphere of fear and anger at Japan. A grave personal injustice was done to the American citizens and residents of Japanese ancestry who, without individual review or any probative evidence against them were excluded, removed and detained by the United States during World War II.”

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that President Ronald Reagan signed into law the federal Civil Liberties Act of 1988 and declared during the signing ceremony that, “This is a great day for America.” In that act the Congress declared as follows:

“The Congress recognizes that, as described in the Commission on Wartime Relocation and Internment of Civilians, a grave injustice was done to both citizens and permanent residents of Japanese ancestry by the evacuation, relocation, and internment of civilians during World War II. As the Commission documents, these actions were carried out without adequate security reasons and without any acts of espionage or sabotage documented by the Commission, and were motivated largely by racial prejudice, wartime hysteria, and a failure of political leadership. The excluded individuals of Japanese ancestry suffered
 enormous damages, both material and intangible, and there were incalculable losses in education and job training, all of which resulted in significant human suffering for which appropriate compensation has not been
 made. For these fundamental violations of the basic civil liberties and constitutional rights of these individuals of Japanese ancestry, the Congress apologizes on behalf of the Nation.”

(e) The Legislature further finds and declares that, just as in 1942 when President Franklin Roosevelt issued Executive Order 9066 calling for the exclusion and incarceration of Japanese Americans as national security threats, so in 2017 President Donald Trump has issued executive orders calling for a travel ban for immigrants and refugees from Muslim-majority countries on the basis of national security. Moreover, during the 2016 presidential campaign, President Trump called for “a total and complete shutdown of Muslims entering the United States,” as well as for a national Muslim registry. These actions and proposed actions made 75 years
 after the issuance of Executive Order 9066 highlight the ongoing need for public educational activities and the development of educational materials to ensure that the exclusion and incarceration of Japanese Americans will not only be remembered, but also properly understood, so that no group or community is ever again unjustly targeted as Japanese Americans were during World War II.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 13.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. California Civil Liberties Public Education Grant Program [13015. - 13030.]

13015.

(a) The State Librarian shall allocate grants pursuant to the program established by this part. The grants awarded under the program shall be awarded on a competitive basis.

(b) The State Librarian may contract with service providers or vendors to further the intent of the program established by this part.

(c) An advisory panel is hereby established and will be appointed to evaluate and make recommendations to the State Librarian based on grant applications. The members of the advisory panel shall be appointed as follows:

(1) The Governor shall appoint five members.

(2) The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint two members.

(3) The Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint two members.

(d) The State Librarian shall award grants for applications that meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Applicants demonstrate the capability to administer and complete the proposed project within specified deadlines and within the specified budget.

(2) Applicants have the experience, knowledge, and qualifications to conduct quality educational activities regarding the exclusion and detention of Japanese Americans during
 World War II and to link that period of history with current civil liberties challenges, including, but not limited to, civil rights violations or civil liberties injustices that are perpetrated on the basis of an individual’s race, national origin, immigration status, religion, gender, or sexual orientation.

(3) Projects link the Japanese American exclusion and detention experience with the experiences of other communities or populations so that the cause and circumstances of this and similar violations of civil rights or acts of injustice may be illuminated and understood and link those experiences with current civil liberties challenges, including, but not limited to, civil liberties injustices that are perpetrated on the basis of an individual’s race, national origin, immigration status, religion, gender, or sexual orientation.

(4) Projects are designed to maximize the long-term educational impact of this chapter.

(5) Projects build upon, contribute to, and expand upon the existing body of educational and research materials on the exclusion and detention of Japanese Americans during World War II or similar violations of civil rights or acts of injustice carried out against a particular community or population.

(6) Projects include the variety of experiences regarding the exclusion and detention of Japanese Americans and its impact before, during, and after World War II, including those Japanese Americans who served in the military and those who were incarcerated in Department of Justice camps, and link those experiences with
 current civil liberties challenges, including, but not limited to, civil liberties injustices that are perpetrated on the basis of an individual’s race, national origin, immigration status, religion, gender, or sexual orientation.

(e) Applicants for grants pursuant to this section are encouraged to do each of the following:

(1) Involve former detainees, those excluded from the military area, and their descendants in the development and implementation of projects.

(2) Involve individuals and their descendants from communities or populations that have experienced civil rights violations or acts of injustice in the development and implementation of projects.

(3) Develop a strategy and plan for raising the level of awareness and understanding among the American public regarding the exclusion and detention of Japanese Americans during World War II so that the causes and circumstances of this and similar events may be illuminated and understood.

(4) Develop a strategy and plan in the development and implementation of projects for raising the level of awareness and understanding among the American public regarding current civil liberties challenges, including, but not limited to, civil rights violations or civil liberties injustices that are perpetrated on the basis of an individual’s race, national origin, immigration status, religion, gender, or sexual orientation.

(5) Develop a strategy and plan for reaching the broad, multicultural
 population through project activities.

(6) Develop local and regional consortia of organizations and individuals engaged in similar educational, research, and development efforts.

(7) Coordinate and collaborate with organizations and individuals engaging in similar educational, research, and development endeavors to maximize the effect of projects.

(8) Utilize creative and innovative methods and approaches in the research, development, and implementation of their projects.

(9) Seek matching funds, in-kind contributions, or other sources of support to supplement their proposal.

(10) Use a variety of
 media, including new technology, and the arts to creatively and strategically appeal to a broad American public while enhancing and enriching community-based educational efforts.

(11) Include in the grant application scholarly inquiry related to the variety of experiences and impact of the exclusion and detention of persons of Japanese ancestry during World War II, as well as its relationship to the experience of other populations so that the causes, circumstances, lessons, and contemporary applications of this and similar events will be illuminated and understood.

(12) Include in the grant application scholarly inquiry related to the variety of experiences and impact of civil rights violations or acts of injustice carried out against a particular community or population, as
 well as their relationship to the experience of other communities or populations so that the causes, circumstances, lessons, and contemporary applications of this and similar events will be illuminated and understood.

(13) Add relevant materials to or catalogue relevant materials in libraries and other repositories for the creation, publication, and distribution of bibliographies, curriculum guides, oral histories, and other resource directories and supporting the continued development of scholarly work on this subject by making a broad range of archival, library, and research materials more accessible to the American public.

(f) The State Librarian may adopt other criteria as he or she deems appropriate for his or her review of grant proposals. In reviewing projects for
 funding, scoring shall be based on an evaluation of all application materials: narratives, attachments, support letters, supplementary materials, and other materials that may be requested of applicants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 292, Sec. 2.   (AB 491)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13020.

(a) In the review process, the State Librarian shall assign the following order of priority to the criteria set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 13015:

(1) Criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, shall be given highest priority.

(2) Criteria set forth in paragraphs (5) and (6) shall be given second priority.

(b) The State Librarian shall consider the overall breadth and variety of the field of applicants to determine the projects that would best fulfill its program and mission. Final grant awards may be
 for the full amount of the grant requests or for a portion of the grant request.

(c) Applicants for grants pursuant to this section may include any of the following:

(1) Nonprofit organizations exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, including, but not limited to, cultural institutions, arts organizations, and community organizations.

(2) Four-year colleges and universities.

(3) Individual artists, writers, journalists, scholars, and educators who are fiscally sponsored by nonprofit organizations exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) Units of government.

(5) Consortia composed of any of the entities described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive.

(d) Grants allocated pursuant to this section shall be provided for the general purpose of establishing a legacy of remembrance as part of a continuing process of recovery from World War II exclusion and detention, as well as similar civil rights violations or civil liberties injustices that have been carried out against other communities or populations, and specifically to do the following:

(1) Educate the public regarding the history and the lessons of the World War II exclusion, removal, and detention of persons of Japanese ancestry through the development, coordination, and distribution
 of new educational materials and the development of curriculum materials to complement and augment resources currently available on this subject matter.

(2) Educate the public through the development, coordination, and distribution of new educational materials and the development of curriculum materials to complement and augment resources currently available on this subject matter regarding the history and the lessons of civil rights violations or civil liberties injustices that have been carried out against other communities or populations, including, but not limited to, civil rights violations or civil liberties injustices that are perpetrated on the basis of an individual’s race, national origin, immigration status, religion, gender, or sexual orientation.

(3) Link historic civil
 rights violations or civil liberties injustices with current civil liberties challenges.

(4) Develop videos, plays, presentations, speaker bureaus, and exhibitions for presentation to elementary, secondary, and community college audiences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 292, Sec. 3.   (AB 491)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13025.

(a) On or before January 1, 2021, the State Librarian shall report to the Governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of each house of the Legislature on the types of grants awarded and the accomplishments of the program established pursuant to this part.

(b) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is inoperative on January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 292, Sec. 4.   (AB 491)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13030.

(a) Funding for this program is subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or other measure for this purpose.

(b) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or other measure for this purpose, the State Librarian shall review and identify programs with similar goals that may be combined with this project in the future.

(c) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or other measure for this purpose, the State Librarian shall report to the Legislature by November 1, 2021, on the progress of the program and on the results of the review required by subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 292, Sec. 5.   (AB 491)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 8.7. CALIFORNIA NATIVE AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION GRANT PROGRAM [13040. - 13042.]

13040.

(a) The State Librarian shall expend the funds allocated for the purposes of this part to develop, in consultation with the State Department of Education and the Curriculum Development and Supplemental Materials Commission related to history-social science curriculum framework and content standards, California Native American instructional resources for use in the public schools maintaining any combination of instructional settings from kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive.
